North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159A. Pollution Abatement and Industrial Facilities Financing Act.
§§ 159A-1 through 159A-25.
[Repealed]

Unconstitutional.

Editor’s Note.

This Chapter, enacted by Session Laws 1971, c. 633, and comprising

G.S. 159A-1

through 159A-25, was held unconstitutional in Stanley v. Department of Conservation & Dev.,

284 N.C. 15

, 199 S.E.2d 641 (1973). A new Chapter 159A, covering the same subject matter, was enacted by Session Laws 1975, c. 800, effective upon ratification of an enabling amendment to the state Constitution, and has been recodified as Chapter 159C.